Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.300

Verified complaints of consignor—Investigations.

For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter the director is authorized to receive verified complaints from any consignor against any commission merchant, dealer, broker, cash buyer, or agent or any person, assuming or attempting to act as such, and upon receipt of such verified complaint shall have full authority to make any and all necessary investigations relative to the said complaint.

[ 1959 c 139 s 30.]